Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3903
Cooperation and communication among courts.

Sections 43-1235, 43-1236, and 43-1237 apply to cooperation and communications among courts in proceedings under the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.

Laws 2007, LB341, § 3.